Maine, session 132, LD2049.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 26 MRSA §1318 is enacted to read:
§1318. Joint and several liability
1. Contractors and construction subcontractors. A contractor and the contractor's
construction subcontractor in the construction industry that is responsible for performing
or directing craft work are jointly and severally liable to the construction subcontractor's
employees for the construction subcontractor's violation of this chapter or chapter 7.
Except as otherwise provided in an executed and enforceable contract between a contractor
and a construction subcontractor, the construction subcontractor shall indemnify the
contractor for any wages, damages, interest, penalties and attorney's fees owed as a result
of the construction subcontractor's violation of this chapter or chapter 7, unless the violation
was due to the lack of prompt payment in accordance with the terms of the contract between
the contractor and the construction subcontractor.
For the purposes of this subsection, "construction subcontractor" has the same meaning as
in Title 39-A, section 105-A, subsection 1, paragraph B.
2. Employment agencies and employers. An employment agency that employs an
employee who performs work on behalf of or for the benefit of another employer pursuant
to a temporary staffing arrangement or contract for services is, together with the employer,
jointly and severally liable for violation of this chapter or chapter 7.
Except as otherwise provided in an executed and enforceable contract between an
employment agency and an employer, the employment agency shall indemnify the
employer for any wages, damages, interest, penalties and attorney's fees owed as a result
of the employment agency's violation of this chapter or chapter 7.